Hawaii, session 2026, HB2139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Acalolepta aesthetica, or Queensland longhorn beetle, is native to Australia, was initially found in Hawaii in 2009, and was first associated with a local plant in 2014 when it was found on an ʻulu in Puna.  Since then, the Queensland longhorn beetle's known host range has expanded to nearly twenty known host species in the State and has spread across east Hawaii Island, now found as far north as Honokaʻa. The legislature further finds that the Queensland longhorn beetle targets many agriculturally important plants such as ʻulu, cacao, avocado, and citrus, and culturally significant trees like kukui.  The adult beetles lay their eggs on the trunk of the tree, and the larvae hatch and bore into the tree to remain for several months, causing significant damage as they grow and bore through.  The beetles then complete their life cycle by pupating within the tree and emerging as an adult, leaving a penny-sized exit hole in the tree, which in many cases kills the tree. The legislature believes that if populations of the Queensland longhorn beetle are left unchecked, the beetles will spread statewide and cause significant losses in crops, the extinction of native species, and the destruction of native forests. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii to conduct a study on effective treatment methods to reduce populations of the Queensland longhorn beetle. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $138,443 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the university of Hawaii to conduct a study on effective treatment methods to reduce populations of the Queensland longhorn beetle. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________